Washington statutes.
RCW 42.41.060

Local government administrative hearings account.

The local government administrative hearings account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from penalties in RCW 42.41.040 and the surcharges under RCW 43.09.2801 shall be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for administrative hearings under this chapter. Only the chief administrative law judge or his or her designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for expenditures.

[ 1992 c 44 s 7.]